Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3035.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5521DP (5) 91 as/js S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 124.204, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraphs: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . dd. 2-(2-(4-butoxybenzyl)-5-nitro- 3 1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine. Other name: 4 Butonitazene. 5 NEW PARAGRAPH . de. N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-fluorobenzyl)- 6 5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine. Other name: 7 Flunitazene. 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . df. N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4- 9 methyoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine. Other 10 name: Metodesnitazene. 11 NEW PARAGRAPH . dg. N-phenyl-N-(1-(2- 12 phenylpropyl)piperidin-4-yl)acetamide. Other name: 13 beta-methylacetyl fentanyl. 14 NEW PARAGRAPH . dh. N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-(1- 15 phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-20carboxamide. Other name: 16 meta-fluorofuranyl fentanyl. 17 NEW PARAGRAPH . di. N-(2-chlorophenyl)-N-(1- 18 phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide. Other name: 19 ortho-chlorofentanyl. 20 NEW PARAGRAPH . dj. N-(2-methylphenyl)-N-(1- 21 phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)cyclopropanecarboxamide. Other 22 name: ortho-methylcyclopropyl fentanyl. 23 NEW PARAGRAPH . dk. N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1- 24 phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide. Other name: 25 para-chlorofentanyl. 26 NEW PARAGRAPH . dl. N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1- 27 phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)pentanamide. Other name: para-fluoro 28 valeryl fentanyl. 29 NEW PARAGRAPH . dm. N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)- 30 N-phenyltetrahydrothiophene-2-carboxamide. Other names: 31 tetrahydrothiofuranyl fentanyl; tetrahydrothiophene fentanyl. 32 Sec. 2. Section 124.204, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 33 by adding the following new paragraph: 34 NEW PARAGRAPH . cq. 1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2- 35 -1- LSB 5521DP (5) 91 as/js 1/ 3 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ (dimethylamino)pentan-1-one. Other names: dipentylone; 1 N,N-dimethylpentylone. 2 Sec. 3. Section 124.204, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 3 by adding the following new paragraph: 4 NEW PARAGRAPH . m. ethyl 2-phenyl-2-(piperidin-2- 5 yl)acetate. Other name: ethylphenidate. 6 Sec. 4. Section 124.204, subsection 9, Code 2026, is amended 7 by adding the following new paragraphs: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . w. 2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1-(2- 9 (pyrrolidin-1-yl)ethyl)-1H-benzimidazole, its isomers, esters, 10 ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers. Other 11 names: N-pyrrolidino metonitazene; metonitazepyne. 12 NEW PARAGRAPH . x. 5-nitro-2-(4-propoxybenzyl)-1-(2- 13 (pyrrolidin-1-yl)ethyl)-1H-benzimidazole, its isomers, esters, 14 ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers. Other 15 names: N-pyrrolidino protonitazene; protonitazepyne. 16 Sec. 5. Section 124.204, subsection 9, paragraphs c, e, and 17 f, Code 2026, are amended by striking the paragraphs. 18 Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 19 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 20